Utah statutes.
9-9-104.6.   Participation of state agencies in meetings with tribal leaders -- Contact information.

(1)  For at least three of the joint meetings described in Subsection 9-9-104.5(2)(a), the division shall coordinate with representatives of tribal governments and the entities listed in Subsection (2) to provide for the broadest participation possible in the joint meetings.

(2)  The following may participate in all meetings described in Subsection (1):

(a)  the chairs of the Native American Legislative Liaison Committee created in Section 36-22-1;

(b)  the governor or the governor's designee; and

(c)  a representative appointed by the chief administrative officer of the following:

(i)  the Department of Health;

(ii)  the Department of Human Services;

(iii)  the Department of Natural Resources;

(iv)  the Department of Workforce Services;

(v)  the Governor's Office of Economic Development;

(vi)  the State Office of Education; and

(vii)  the State Board of Regents.

(3) (a)  The chief administrative officer of the agencies listed in Subsection (3)(b) shall:

(i)  designate the name of a contact person for that agency that can assist in coordinating the efforts of state and tribal governments in meeting the needs of the Native Americans residing in the state; and

(ii)  notify the division:

(A)  who is the designated contact person described in Subsection (3)(a)(i); and

(B)  of any change in who is the designated contact person described in Subsection (3)(a)(i).

(b)  This Subsection (3) applies to:

(i)  the Department of Agriculture and Food;

(ii)  the Department of Community and Culture;

(iii)  the Department of Corrections;

(iv)  the Department of Environmental Quality;

(v)  the Department of Public Safety;

(vi)  the Department of Transportation;

(vii)  the Office of the Attorney General;

(viii)  the State Tax Commission; and

(ix)  any agency described in Subsection (2)(c).

(c)  At the request of the division, a contact person listed in Subsection (3)(b) may participate in a meeting described in Subsection (1).

(4)  A participant under this section who is not a legislator may not receive compensation or benefits for the participant's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

